src/fst/phonology.twolc
! --- j is not in the lexical side
"e pronounced as j between vowels "

E4:j  <=>  :Vowel Null* _ Null* [:Vowel | :j] ;

! lexical: a E4 G1 
! surface: a  e  g
! lexical: a E4 G1 a
! surface: a  j  0 a
! lexical: s o o E4  
! surface: s o 0 e 
! lexical: s o o E4 a 
! surface: s o o j  a 

! --- j is in the lexical side, but surfaces only in certain contexts

! j is i only in word final position

"j appears as i"

J1:i  <=>      _ Null* WordEnd ;

! lexical: a h J1 > {pl.e} {rare}
! surface: a h  i  0    0      0

"j does not surface between consonants 1/2"
    
J1:j /<=    h _ T1: ;
              _ :stop ;

"j does not surface between consonants 2/2"

J1:0  =>   h _ T1: ;
             _ :stop ;

! lexical: r o h J1 T1 > {pl.e} {rare}
! surface: r o h  0  t >    e      0
! lexical: r o h J1 T1 > {pl.e} {rare} {sg.u} {W}
! surface: r o h  0  0 >    0      0     u     0
! lexical: h ä r J1 G1 > {pl.i} {sg.a} 
! surface: h ä r 0  g  >    0      a   

! lexical: h ä r J1 G1 > {pl.i} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: h ä r j  0  >    0      a    0
! lexical: a h J1 > {pl.e} {rare} {sg.u} {W}
! surface: a h j  >   0       0      u    0
! lexical: s a J1 D1 a > {pl.u} {W}
! surface: s a j  0  a >    0    0

! --- 
! juus-juuksed, kälis-käliksed, nõos-nõoksed, omas-omaksed, vennas-vennaksed, ões-õeksed 
"vennas-vennaksed"

K3:k  <=> _ s E1:e ;

! lexical: v e n n a K3 s E1 > d 
! surface: v e n n a k  s  e > d

! hypothesis 
"laas-laane"

N1:0  <=> \[:Consonant] _ S1:s ;   ! laas-laane, tuhandes-tuhendenda etc

! lexical: l a a N1 S1 
! surface: l a a 0  s
!------


! -----
! ----- ad hoc / hard to classify
! -----

! olema, tulema, minema, panema, surema --> 
! olla, tulla, minna, panna, surra; ollakse etc, olles etc
! the context is limited to a few inflectional forms

"double l m n r"

%{dbl%}:Cx <=> :Cx _ Null* [ :a | :e ] ;
      where Cx in (lmnr) ;

! pronounced mässlema, but written mäslema...
! foreign names Kessler etc have ssl cluster, so cannot use a general rule ssl -> sl
! have to resort to the following:
! in weak grade, the true length of a consonant becomes apparent...
! mäslema - mässelda is the only example, but the process itself is not unique

"mäslema"

0:s <=> Consonant Vowel s _ 0:e l e:0 %{W%}: ;

! lexical: m ä s 0 0 l e {W} > d a
! surface: m ä s s e l 0  0  > d a     

!------
! Only pea, hea 
"Pea, hea vs häid, päid, pähe 1"

A6:ä  <=> E6: _ :h ;
          E6: _ Null+ :i ;   

"Pea, hea vs häid, päid, pähe 2"

E6:0  <=> _ A6: :h  ;
          _ A6: Null+ :i ;

"öhe, pähe"
Y3:e  <=> [:ä | :ö] Null* H3:h _ ;

"sohu, suhu"
Y3:u  <=> [:o | :u] Null* H3:h _ ;

"h-illative"
H3:h  <=> _ :* %{S%}: ;

"Long vowel shortens before h"

Vx:0 <=> :Vx _ H3:h  :stemV ;            !  sohu, suhu, öhe, pähe
      where Vx in ( Vowel ) ;  



!----------------

! for debugging in GT infra:
! in ~/giella/lang-est-x-utee/src

! for looking at all the generated forms (use only if the lexicon is really small):
! hfst-fst2strings analyser-gt-desc.hfstol > tmp1

! echo 'laudu' | hfst-lookup analyser-gt-desc.hfstol
! > laudu	laud+N+Pl+Par	8,000000

! echo 'laud+N+Pl+Par' | hfst-lookup fst/lexicon.hfst
! > laud+N+Pl+Par	l˘auD1>{pl.u}{sg.a}>{s}{i}{d}	5,000000

! echo 'l a u D1:d > {pl.u}:u {sg.a}:0 > {s}:0 {i}:0 {d}:0' | hfst-pair-test fst/phonology.compose.hfst
! > Test passed.

! hfst & xfst:
! echo 'raudne+A+Sg+Par' | hfst-lookup fst/lexicon.hfst 
! > raudne+A+Sg+Par	r˘audneE1>t	8,000000

! this has not been tried for a long time...
!  echo 'r˘audneE1>t' | ~/xfst/bin/lookup -flags mbTT fst/lexicon.xfst 
! > r˘audneE1>t	raudne+A+Sg+Par
 

! a minimalistic way:
! make nets for lexc and twol:
! hfst-lexc -o tmp.lexc fst/root.lexc
! hfst-twolc -o tmp.twol fst/phonology.twolc
! echo 'laud+N+Pl+Par' | hfst-lookup tmp.lexc

! echo 'l a u D1:d > {pl.u}:u {sg.a}:0 > {s}:0 {i}:0 {d}:0' | hfst-pair-test tmp.twol
